Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Chapter 14 Regional Transportation Authority

§ 18-14-101.
Establishment; appointment; terms; officers; meetings; compensation; establishment under joint powers agreement.

A regional transportation authority may be established by resolution of any board of county commissioners or by joint powers agreement entered into by any two (2) or more boards of county commissioners and governing bodies of municipalities.

A regional transportation authority established by resolution of any board of county commissioners shall be comprised of not less than five (5) nor more than nine (9) residents of the county appointed by the board. Appointees shall serve a term of three (3) years and may be appointed for one (1) additional term. Terms of office shall be staggered. The board of county commissioners shall appoint a county resident to fill the unexpired term of any vacancy occurring on the authority. The authority shall elect from its membership a chairman, secretary and a treasurer and shall meet at least once every three (3) months at the call of the chairman or upon the request of a majority of the membership. Members shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for necessary travel and per diem expenses in the manner and amount provided state employees.

A regional transportation authority created under a joint powers agreement between two (2) or more boards of county commissioners and governing bodies of municipalities shall be established as a joint powers board in accordance with W.S.

16-1-106

.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 78, § 1.

§ 18-14-102.
Powers and duties.

A regional transportation authority established under W.S.

18-14-101

shall promote and develop regional air and ground transportation for residents under jurisdiction of the authority. In promoting and developing regional transportation, the authority may:

Conduct studies to plan for the development of regional transportation centers providing air transportation and served by sufficient ground transportation to enable use of air services by residents within the jurisdiction of the authority;

Conduct studies to plan for the development of intracity transportation services;

Enter into contract with private air and ground transportation carriers for provision of transportation services;

Negotiate air and ground transportation fares under any contract entered into pursuant to paragraph (a)(iii) of this section;

Receive grants and loans from state or federal agencies and from private sources for purposes of developing transportation within the region;

Enter into agreement with any other regional transportation authority;

Employ technical, legal and administrative assistance and engage the services of research and consulting services as necessary to carry out duties prescribed by this section.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 78, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 18-14-103.
Taxation; limitation; submission to voters; disposition of revenue.

Upon adoption of any resolution by a regional transportation authority for any county or of any resolution by the board of county commissioners for each participating county and of any ordinance by the governing body of a municipality participating in a joint powers agreement pursuant to W.S.

18-14-101

and in accordance with an agreement on the contribution of funds by each participating county and municipality, the appropriate board of county commissioners shall submit to the qualified electors of the county or municipality, as appropriate, the question of whether the board shall annually levy not to exceed one-half (1/2) mill on the dollar of assessed valuation of the county or municipality. Revenues collected under the levy authorized by this subsection shall be used solely for planning, developing and providing regional transportation in the manner specified under W.S.

18-14-102

. The question may be submitted by the county clerk at an election called, conducted, canvassed and returned in the manner provided for bond elections by the Political Subdivision Bond Election Law, W.S.

22-21-101

through

22-21-112

, as specified by the board of county commissioners upon request of the regional transportation authority.

If the proposition is approved, the levy shall expire four (4) years from the date of initial imposition and the same proposition shall be submitted at the general election held four (4) years from the date the proposition is approved and until the proposition is defeated. If the proposition to impose or continue the levy is defeated, it shall not again be submitted to the electors for at least twenty-three (23) months.

If approved by the qualified electors, the board of county commissioners shall certify the levy authorized under subsection (a) of this section and the levy shall be imposed upon the taxable property of the county or municipality. Revenues collected under this levy shall be deposited by the county treasurer into an account certified by the board and used solely for the purpose for which the levy was imposed.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 78, § 1; 1996, ch. 97, § 2.